Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-246.01
Town treasurer; funds; depository.

All township funds withdrawn from the county treasury, or collected directly by township officers, shall be deposited within ten days in depositories approved for the deposit of county funds of such county in an account in the name of the township.

Laws 1951, c. 49, § 1, p. 166.